Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2 State Purchases
37-2-18.1.
Reverse auctions.

Contracts exceeding the amount provided by §

37-2-22

may be awarded by electronic reverse auctions when it is determined in writing by the chief purchasing officer that the state will obtain a better value with this method than with a competitive sealed bid process. Factors to be considered in determining whether electronic reverse auctions shall be utilized shall include:

Whether specifications can be prepared that permit electronic posting of bid solicitations and secure receipt of electronic bids; and

The cost for preparing and executing the auction; and

Whether conditions are such that the commodities or services to be purchased are appropriately competitive.

All reverse auctions shall be conducted electronically using real-time, on-line bidding procedures. These procedures shall include the following:

Participation as a bidder shall be subject to a prequalification process conducted in accordance with the provisions of §

37-2-25.1

.

The solicitation shall designate both an opening date and time and a closing date and time. The closing date and time may be dependent on a variable or variables specified in the solicitation. At the opening date and time, the auctioneer shall begin accepting real-time, on-line bids. The solicitation shall remain open until the closing date and time.

Following receipt of the first bid after the opening date and time, all bid prices shall be posted electronically to the internet and updated on a real-time basis. At any time before the closing date and time, a bidder may offer a lower bid than the lowest bid of any bidder, including his own. A bidder’s lowest bid shall supersede any prior higher bid offered by that bidder. Bid prices may not be increased at any time after the opening date and time. All bids shall be binding and may not be withdrawn. If a price entered by the bidder is in error, the bidder must correct the bid within the time period and manner specified in the solicitation.

The invitation for bids shall state that the award shall be made on the basis of the lowest responsive bid price.

The contract shall be awarded with reasonable promptness by written notice to the responsive and responsible bidder whose bid is either the lowest bid price, lowest evaluated, or responsive bid price.

Subsequent to the awarding of the contract, all documents pertinent to the awarding of the contract shall be made available and open to the public inspection and retained in the bid file.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 296, § 2.

37-2-18.2.
Exemption from competitive bidding.

The three (3) public institutions of higher education (the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College and the Community College of Rhode Island) shall be exempt from the competitive bidding process provisions of this chapter for research or research related activity funded with federal funds or other third-party funds subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the board of governors for higher education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 548, § 1.

37-2-19.
Competitive negotiation.

When, under regulations issued by the chief purchasing officer, the purchasing agent determines in writing that the use of competitive sealed bidding is not practicable, and except as provided in §§

37-2-21

and

37-2-22

, a contract may be awarded by competitive negotiation.

Adequate public notice of the request for proposals to be negotiated shall be given in the same manner as provided in §

37-2-18(c)

.

The request for proposals shall indicate the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors.

Written or oral discussions may be conducted with all responsible offerors who submit proposals determined in writing to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award. All oral discussions conducted with responsible offerors who submit proposals shall be memorialized in writing and all such writings shall be deemed public record at the time the contract is awarded and shall be made available for public inspection. Discussions shall not disclose any information derived from proposals submitted by competing offerors.

An award shall be made to the responsible offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state, taking into consideration price and the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. Discussions need not be conducted if the purchasing agent makes a written determination concerning one or more of the following:

With respect to prices, where the prices are fixed by law or regulation, except that consideration shall be given to competitive terms and conditions;

Where time of delivery or performance will not permit discussions; or

Where it can be clearly demonstrated and documented from the existence of adequate competition or accurate prior cost experience with the particular supply, service, or construction item that acceptance of an initial offer without discussion would result in fair and reasonable prices, and the request for proposals notifies all offerors of the possibility that an award may be made on the basis of the initial offers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 458, § 1.

37-2-20.
Negotiations after unsuccessful competitive sealed bidding.

In the event that all bids submitted pursuant to competitive sealed bidding under §

37-2-18

result in bid prices in excess of the funds available for the purchase and the chief purchasing officer determines in writing:

That there are no additional funds available from any source so as to permit an award to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder, and

The best interest of the state will not permit the delay attendant to a resolicitation under revised specifications, or for revised quantities, under competitive sealed bidding as provided in §

37-2-18

, then a negotiated award may be made as set forth in subsection (b) or (d) of this section.

Where there is more than one bidder, competitive negotiations, pursuant to §

37-2-19

, shall be conducted with the three (3) (or two (2) if there are only two (2)) bidders determined in writing to be the lowest responsive and responsible bidders to the competitive sealed bid invitation. Competitive negotiations shall be conducted under the following restrictions:

If discussions pertaining to the revision of the specifications or quantities are held with any potential offeror, all other potential offerors shall be afforded an opportunity to take part in such discussions; and

A request for proposals, based upon revised specifications or quantities, shall be issued as promptly as possible, shall provide for an expeditious response to the revised requirements, and shall be awarded upon the basis of the lowest bid price, or lowest evaluated bid price submitted by any responsive and responsible offeror.

Contracts may be competitively negotiated when it is determined in writing by the purchasing agent that the bid prices received by competitive sealed bidding were not independently reached in open competition, and for which:

Each competitive bidder has been notified of the intention to negotiate and is given reasonable opportunity to negotiate; and

The negotiated price is lower than the lowest rejected bid by any competitive bidder; and

The negotiated price is the lowest negotiated price offered by a competitive offeror.

When, after competitive sealed bidding, it is determined in writing that there is only one responsive and responsible bidder, a negotiated award may be made with the bidder subject to the provisions of §

37-2-28

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-21.
Noncompetitive procurements.

Sole source. A contract may be awarded for a supply, service, or construction item without competition when, under published regulations, the chief purchasing officer or purchasing agent, determines, in writing, that there is only one source for the required supply, service, or construction item.

Emergency. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the purchasing agent may make or authorize others to make emergency procurements when there exists a threat to public health, welfare, or safety under emergency conditions as defined in the regulations; provided, that the emergency procurements shall be made with such competition as is practicable under the circumstances. A written determination of the basis for the emergency, and for the selection of the particular contractor, shall be included in the contract file.

Noncompetitive negotiation after competitive solicitation. Contracts issued under procedures set forth in §§

37-2-19

,

37-2-20

and

37-2-59

—

37-2-72

may be negotiated with the successful vendor(s) subject to the provisions of §

37-2-28

. A written determination of the basis for the negotiated contract and supporting the negotiated price, shall be included in the contract file.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-22.
Small purchases.

Procurements, not to exceed an aggregate amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for construction and five thousand dollars ($5,000) for all other purchases may be made in accordance with small purchase regulations promulgated by the chief purchasing officer. Procurement requirements shall not be artificially divided so as to constitute a small purchase under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.

37-2-23.
Cancellation of invitation for bids and requests for proposals.

An invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or other solicitation may be cancelled, or all bids or proposals may be rejected, if it is determined, in writing, that the cancellation or rejection is taken in the best interest of the state and approved by the chief purchasing officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-24.
Responsibilities of bidders and offerors.

A written determination of responsibility of a bidder or offeror shall be made and it shall be made in accordance with regulations issued by the chief purchasing officer.

A reasonable inquiry to determine the financial strength and responsibility of a business which is a bidder or offeror shall be conducted. The failure of a bidder or offeror to promptly supply information in connection with the inquiry, including, but not limited to, financial statements and business references, shall be grounds for a determination of nonresponsibility with respect to that bidder or offeror.

Said financial analysis may include the review of the business by a nationally recognized commercial credit reporting bureau. A consistent policy for ordering credit bureau reports shall be developed and approved by the chief purchasing officer.

Except as otherwise provided by law, information furnished by a bidder or offeror pursuant to this section may not be disclosed outside of the division of state purchasing or the purchasing agency administering the contract without prior written consent of the bidder or offeror.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 137, § 1.

37-2-25.
Prequalification of contractors — General.

The chief purchasing officer may provide for prequalification of suppliers as responsible prospective contractors for particular types of supplies, services, and construction. Solicitation mailing lists of potential contractors of the supplies, services, and construction shall include but need not be limited to prequalified contractors. Prequalification shall not foreclose a written determination:

Between the time of the bid opening or receipt of offers and the making of an award, that a prequalified supplier is not responsible; or

That a supplier who is not prequalified at the time of bid opening or receipt of offers is responsible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-25.1.
Prequalification of vendors for electronic reverse auctions.

Potential bidders shall be prequalified for participation in each electronic auction.

A request for qualifications shall be issued stating the intent to conduct a reverse auction in accordance with the provisions of §

37-2-18.1

. The request for qualifications shall identify the goods and services to be purchased and the criteria to be used to determine how many and/or which bidders will be selected to participate in the reverse auction. All requests for qualifications shall be solicited through utilization of the Rhode Island Vendor Information Program (RIVIP) as set forth in §

37-2-17.1

.

Participants shall be selected based on the criteria set forth in the request for qualifications, including agreement to any terms, conditions or other requirements of the solicitation. Written or oral discussions may be conducted with all responsible vendors determined in writing to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award.

Prior to the execution of the auction potential bidders shall be required to receive instruction on the use of the selected electronic bidding procedure. Only bidders who successfully complete the training phase of prequalification shall be permitted to participate in the electronic reverse auction specified in the request for qualifications.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 296, § 2.

37-2-26.
Prequalification of contractors — Roads — Department of transportation.

Prequalification for a contractor who bids on road work for the department of transportation shall be as follows:

A list of equipment in his or her possession and which he or she proposes to use on the contract if awarded to him or her.

The name and qualifications of his or her superintendent or supervisory personnel to be assigned to the major features of the work.

His or her financial references and an original copy of his or her current financial statement.

The successful contractor is required to submit to the Rhode Island department of transportation for approval, executed contract agreement(s) between the contractor and the qualified DBE to be utilized during the performance of the work.

Prior to submitting the above, any subcontractor and/or supplier must first receive subcontract approval by the Rhode Island department of transportation.

Provide the number of proposed trainees to be trained in each classification and training programs as stated in the required contract provisions for federal aid projects (training special provisions page 15 par. 3).

The above requirement will be submitted to the Rhode Island department of transportation external equal employment opportunity office for approval.

The name of the individual who will act as the equal employment opportunity officer for this company.

Four (4) copies on the company’s letterhead of certification of nondiscrimination in equal employment opportunity.

The successful contractor shall provide the names of proposed subcontractors and the phase and extent of the work which they will perform. If any have not performed similar work for this state, supply experience records for similar types of work performed elsewhere.

Copies of letters directly from the contractor’s bonding and insurance companies indicating their willingness to furnish the required bonds and insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 158.

37-2-27.
Prequalification — Construction management.

A person who bids on a construction management contract shall provide the following information, which information shall constitute the prequalifications for a construction management contract.

Firm history.

Name of the firm.

Location of principal and branch offices.

Length of time in business.

Firm ownership structure.

Annual construction management volume for each of the past five (5) years including number of projects and total construction volume.

Personnel.

Total number of the firm’s personnel, other than secretarial/clerical, by professional or skill group.

Outside firms which will be used to provide such services as estimating, value engineering analysis, scheduling, or computer services.

Experience.

Projects which the firm has constructed during the past five (5) years, including, those where the firm has served as construction manager including the project name and address, year completed, type of project, construction cost and reference.

Project staffing.

The firm’s proposed management staff for the project including an organizational chart identifying the firm’s key staff members and showing how each staff member interacts with other staff members assigned to the project.

Detailed resume for each key staff member which summarizes education, professional registration, professional society membership, construction experience, and construction management project experience.

Services.

Scope of preconstruction phase services, including how those services are provided, with specific attention to the first budget estimate, methods of cost control, scheduling, value engineering, and the method of reporting project status and schedule position.

Scope of construction phase services and how those services are to be provided.

The firm’s method of working with the project architects, engineers, consultants, and other planning team members.

The firm’s method of coordinating the efforts of the various trade contractors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-27.1.
Procurement of construction manager at-risk services — Written determination.

Prior to procuring construction manager at-risk services, the chief purchasing officer must sign a written determination documenting the following:

That in accordance with the factors set forth in subsection (c) below, the general contractor method of construction management as provided under §

37-2-18

is not practicable for the construction of the project or will not result in the best value for the state;

That the using agency has clearly identified in writing why the use of construction management at-risk method of construction management as defined under §

37-2-7(30)

is appropriate for the building project;

That the building project has an estimated construction value of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more;

That the using agency has in place written procedures to ensure fairness in competition, evaluation, and reporting of results at every stage in the procurement process;

That the using agency has the capacity, a detailed plan, and procedures in place to effectively procure and manage construction management at-risk services for the project and has procured the services of a qualified owner’s program manager for the project, as set forth in §

37-2-7(32)

; and

That the using agency has a detailed, written plan with clearly identified procedures to monitor and approve all reimbursable costs for the project.

The chief purchasing officer shall file copies of the written determination with the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, the senate fiscal advisor and the house fiscal advisor no later than three (3) business days after executing the written determination.

Except for subsection (d) of this section, notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, including any provision exempting any entity from the requirements of this chapter, the chief executive officer of a public corporation as defined in §

35-20-5(4)

, or the chief executive officer of a public agency as defined in §

37-2-7(16)

, prior to procuring construction manager at-risk services, shall sign a written determination documenting the following:

That in accordance with the factors set forth in subsection (c) below, the general contractor method of construction management is not practicable for the construction of the project or will not result in the best value for the public corporation or the public agency;

Why the use of construction management at-risk method of construction management is appropriate for the building project;

That the building project has an estimated construction value of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more;

That the public corporation or public agency has in place written procedures to ensure fairness in competition, evaluation, and reporting of results at every stage in the procurement process;

That the public corporation or public agency has the capacity, a detailed plan, and procedures in place to effectively procure and manage construction management at-risk services for the project and has procured the services of a qualified owner’s program manager for the project as set forth in §

37-2-7(32)

; and

That there is a detailed, written plan with clearly identified procedures to monitor and approve all reimbursable costs for the project.

The chief executive officer shall file copies of the written determination with the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, the senate fiscal advisor, and the house fiscal advisor no later than three (3) business days after executing the written determination.

When evaluating the procurement of construction manager at-risk services, the factors that may be considered in determining whether the general contractor method of construction management is not practicable or will not result in the best value for the state, public corporation, or public agency shall include:

Whether specifications can be prepared that permit award on the basis of either the lowest bid or the lowest-evaluated bid price;

Whether the available sources, the time and place of performance, and other relevant circumstances exist as are appropriate for the use of competitive sealed bidding;

The complexity of the project, including the existing or proposed infrastructure or structures, required demolition or abatement, adjacency to other structures or abutters, site constraints, building systems, uniqueness of design elements, or environmental implications;

The size, scope, and estimated cost of the project;

The adequacy of available documentation regarding the existing site, buildings, or structures; abutter infrastructure, buildings, or structures; or other documentation of as-built conditions;

Phasing or logistical challenges arising out of the need to maintain existing occupancy, continue existing operations, provide phased occupancy, or achieve more favorable project financing terms;

The anticipated impact of fast-tracked design and construction on project cost or schedule;

Potential to achieve optimal minority or woman business enterprise or other subcontractor or vendor participation required in accordance with any applicable state or federal laws;

The amount and type of financing available for the project, including whether the budget is fixed and the source of funding, for example, general or special appropriation, federal assistance monies, general obligation bonds or revenue bonds;

The administration or implementation of procedures required to comply with applicable regulations or statutes; and

Mitigating the potential claims against the state arising from the inherent risks associated with factors noted in subdivisions (3) through (10) of this subsection.

The provisions of §§

37-2-27.1

through

37-2-27.5

shall not apply to highway or heavy construction projects that are procured by either the Rhode Island department of transportation, a public corporation, a public agency, or any city or town in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 400, § 1.

37-2-27.2.
Procurement of construction manager at-risk services — Owner’s program manager.

In order to bring the experience and knowledge necessary to maximize the benefits of the construction manager at-risk method of construction management, a using agency shall procure an owner’s program manager as set forth in §

37-2-7(32)

prior to procuring a construction manager at-risk. The owner’s program manager shall have at least seven (7) years experience in the construction and supervision of the construction of buildings of similar size and complexity. The owner’s program manager shall not have been employed during the preceding year by the design firm, the construction management at-risk firm, and/or the subcontractors associated with the project.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or of the general or public laws to the contrary, including any provision exempting any entity from the requirements of this chapter, all public corporations as defined in §

35-20-5(4)

and public agencies as defined in §

37-2-7(16)

, shall be subject to and shall comply with the terms of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 400, § 1.

37-2-27.3.
Procurement of construction manager at-risk services — Technical review committee.

When procuring construction manager at-risk services for a using agency, other than a public corporation or a public agency, a technical review committee shall be appointed by the chief purchasing officer to evaluate the statements of qualifications, performance data, and cost proposals submitted and any other relevant information. The technical review committee shall be comprised of five (5) members with one member from the division of legal services at the department of administration; one member from the department of administration with experience in the construction of capital projects; one member from the division of purchases; and no more than two (2) members from the using agency. The using agency’s owner’s program manager shall advise and assist the technical review committee as necessary. The members of a technical review committee of a public corporation or a public agency shall be determined in accordance with their own policies and procedures.

Prior to opening the cost or pricing data, the technical review committee shall prequalify at least two (2) firms as professionally and technically qualified. If unable to prequalify two (2) firms, then the technical review committee may either re-advertise the request for proposals or may recommend to the chief purchasing officer that the general contractor method of construction management be utilized on the project. If the technical review committee is unable to prequalify at least two (2) firms after the second advertising of the request for proposals for construction manager at-risk services, then the chief purchasing officer shall require the using agency to utilize the general contractor method of construction management for the project.

The department of administration’s division of capital projects, in conjunction with the division of purchases, shall assist the using agency in drafting the request for proposals used to procure the construction manager at-risk services, provided that such assistance is not mandatory for a public corporation or a public agency which may develop the request for proposals without such assistance.

If federal restrictions do not prohibit the consideration of cost in the selection process, then the request for proposals shall require that the proposals submitted itemize the following:

The fee for pre-construction services;

The fee for construction services with the profit and overhead separately itemized; and

The estimated cost of the general conditions.

The request for proposals shall include a standardized contract for construction manager at-risk services in a form acceptable to the chief purchasing officer. Firms responding to the request for proposals shall submit proposed changes to the contract language in writing as part of their proposal. The technical review committee shall consider the favorability to the state of any proposed changes to the standardized contract as a criteria for evaluating and ranking the firms.

The technical review subcommittee may conduct written or oral negotiations concerning proposed changes to the standardized contract with all offerors determined in writing to be reasonably susceptible to being selected for award. Any negotiations conducted must be clearly memorialized through the detailed documentation of the decisions made and the reasons for those decisions.

The technical review committee shall submit its written recommendations of eligible construction management at-risk firms to the chief purchasing officer.

The chief purchasing officer shall issue a written determination selecting a construction management at-risk firm for the project that includes findings that all the terms of the proposed contract are fair and reasonable to the state.

The construction management at-risk firm selected for the project may not be reimbursed or paid for any services provided prior to the execution of the contract by the chief purchasing officer, a representative of the using agency, and a representative of the construction manager at-risk firm and the issuance of a purchase order.

The chief purchasing officer shall negotiate the guaranteed, maximum price as an amendment to the contract executed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section when the design documents are no less than sixty percent (60%) complete. The guaranteed, maximum price shall represent the maximum amount to be paid by the using agency for the building project, including the cost of the work, the general conditions, and the fee payable to the construction management at-risk firm.

The guaranteed maximum price shall itemize:

The amount of any construction manager at-risk contingency;

The amount of the general conditions;

Any fees, including fees incurred prior to the guaranteed maximum price;

Each allowance with a statement of its basis;

A breakdown of costs by trade;

The dates for substantial and final completion upon which the guaranteed, maximum price is based;

A schedule of applicable alternates and the unit prices; and

The drawings, specifications, and other information on which the price is based.

The chief purchasing officer shall issue a written determination that all the terms of the guaranteed, maximum price amendment are fair and reasonable to the state.

The project may not proceed to the construction phase without the execution of the guaranteed, maximum-price amendment to the contract by the chief purchasing officer, a representative of the using agency, and a representative of the construction management at-risk firm and issuance of an approved change order; provided, nevertheless, the chief purchasing officer may authorize the commencement of preliminary investigatory, site, or other construction if the chief purchasing officer issues a written determination that such preliminary construction is advantageous to, and in the best interest of, the state, public corporation, or public agency, and the remaining requirements for the commencement of construction set forth above are satisfied as it relates to the proposed preliminary construction.

If the chief purchasing officer is unable to obtain a guaranteed, maximum-price amendment that is fair and reasonable to the state or if the construction management at-risk firm is unable to provide all necessary bonds within ten (10) days of the execution of the amendment, then the chief purchasing officer may terminate the construction management at-risk contract and:

Negotiate a new construction management at-risk contract and guaranteed, maximum-price agreement with the next-most qualified construction management at-risk firm as determined by the technical review committee; or

Order that the project shall be completed through the utilization of the general contractor method of construction management.

No provision of this section is intended to require a party to breach a contract disclosed to the using agency and executed prior to the award of the construction management at-risk contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 400, § 1.

37-2-27.4.
Procurement of construction manager at-risk services — Bidding of subcontracts.

In order to promote transparency and the fair and equitable treatment of all persons who deal with the procurement system, when using the construction manager at-risk method of construction management on a project, subcontractors, equipment, and material purchases shall be procured pursuant to the following:

All potential vendors shall be prequalified as responsible bidders or offerors as defined in §

37-2-15(6)

;

The construction management at-risk firm shall be provided with access to the Rhode Island Vendor Information Program (“RIVIP”) and/or the relevant portion of the program or information thereon in such direct or indirect manner as the director of the department of administration may determine for the purpose of issuing solicitations to pre-qualified vendors for subcontracts, equipment, and materials necessary for the project. The construction manager at-risk shall use the RIVIP for solicitation of bids for all subcontractors, equipment, and material necessary for the project;

All bids shall be opened in public at the time and place designated in the solicitation for bids and each bid, together with the name of the bidder, shall be recorded and an abstract made available for public inspection;

The construction manager at-risk shall evaluate the bid proposals and conduct further negotiations with vendors where appropriate;

Prior to the awarding of a project-related contract by the construction manager at-risk, the using agency shall provide its written approval;

The construction manager at-risk shall award all project-related contracts with reasonable promptness after approval by the using agency.

When using the construction manager at-risk method of construction management, all subcontract work, equipment, and material purchases shall be memorialized by the construction management at-risk firm and the using agency through detailed documentation of the decisions made and the reasons for those decisions.

All bid documents, bid abstracts, and documents referring to the bid process shall be public in accordance with the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38, the Access to Public Records Act. The burden to identify trade secrets, commercial or financial information, or other records not subject to public disclosure pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38 shall rest with the bidder or offeror.

Any person or entity denied the right to inspect records may appeal the denial in accordance with the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38, the Access to Public Records Act.

No provision of this section is intended to require a party to breach a contract disclosed to the using agency and executed prior to the award of the construction management at-risk contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 400, § 1.

37-2-27.5.
Procurement of construction manager at-risk services — Public records.

All documents related to a construction project delivered through a construction manager at-risk, including, but not limited to, design documents, construction documents, bid documents, financial documents and contract documents, shall be considered public records and be made available for public inspection in accordance with chapter 38-2, entitled the Access to Public Records Act. Information may only be withheld from public inspection if the construction manager at-risk firm or the relevant subcontractor specifically states in writing a description of the data or materials to be protected and the reasons why protection is necessary, and if the chief purchasing officer determines through a written determination that the records are not public pursuant to chapter 38-2 access to public records law. The burden to identify trade secrets, commercial or financial information, or other information not subject to public disclosure pursuant to chapter 38-2 shall rest with the construction manager at-risk or the relevant subcontractor. Any person or entity denied the right to inspect records may appeal the denial in accordance with chapter 38-2, the Access to Public Records law.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, including any provision exempting any entity from the requirements of this chapter, all public corporations as defined in subdivision

35-20-5(4)

and quasi-public agencies, shall be subject to and shall comply with the terms of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 336, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 385, § 2.

37-2-28.
Cost or pricing data.

A contractor shall submit cost or pricing data and shall certify that, to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, the cost or pricing data submitted was accurate, complete, and current as of a mutually determined specified date prior to the date of:

The pricing of any negotiated contract where the total contract price is expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); or

The pricing of any change order or contract modification which is expected to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or such lesser amount in either instance as may be prescribed by the purchasing agent and approved by the budget office.

Any contract, change, or modification thereto, under which a certificate is required, shall contain a provision that the price to the state, including profit or fee, shall be adjusted to exclude any significant sums by which the purchasing agent finds that the price was increased because the contractor furnished cost or pricing data, as of the date agreed upon between the parties, was inaccurate, incomplete, or not current.

The requirements of this section need not be applied to contracts where the price negotiated is based on adequate price competition, established catalogue or market prices of commercial items sold in substantial quantities to the general public, prices set by law or regulation, or in exceptional cases where it is determined, in writing, by the chief purchasing officer that the requirements of this section may be waived, and the reasons for that waiver are stated in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-29.
Cost plus a percentage of cost.

The cost plus a percentage of cost type of contract shall not be used.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-30.
Cost reimbursement contracts.

No contract providing for the reimbursement of the contractor’s cost plus a fixed fee, hereinafter referred to as a cost reimbursement contract, may be made under §

37-2-19

,

37-2-20

, or

37-2-21

unless it is determined, in writing, by the chief purchasing officer that the contract is likely to be less costly to the state than any other type of contract, or that it is impracticable to obtain supplies or services of the kind or quality required except under a cost reimbursement contract.

Each contractor under a cost reimbursement type contract shall obtain consent, as provided for in the contract, before entering into:

A cost reimbursement type subcontract; or

Any other type of subcontract involving more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or ten percent (10%) of the estimated cost of the prime contract.

All cost reimbursement type contracts shall contain a provision that only costs recognized as allowable, in accordance with cost principles set forth in regulations issued pursuant to §

37-2-42

, will be reimbursable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2.

37-2-31.
Use of other types of contracts.

Subject to the limitations of §§

37-2-29

and

37-2-30

, any type of contract which will promote the best interests of the state may be used.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 526, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 1.